Maryland, session 2026, HB0686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–904.
(a) In this section, “visual or audible signal” includes a signal by hand, voice,
emergency light or siren.
(b) If a police officer gives a visual or audible signal to stop and the police officer
is in uniform, prominently displaying the police officer’s badge or other insignia of office, a
driver of a vehicle may not attempt to elude the police officer by:
(1) Willfully failing to stop the driver’s vehicle;
(2) Fleeing on foot; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0686*

HOUSE BILL 686
(3) Any other means.
(c) If a police officer gives a visual or audible signal to stop and the police officer,
whether or not in uniform, is in a vehicle appropriately marked as an official police vehicle,
a driver of a vehicle may not attempt to elude the police officer by:
(1) Willfully failing to stop the driver’s vehicle;
(2) Fleeing on foot; or
(3) Any other means.
(d) (1) A driver may not commit a violation of subsection (b)(1) or (c)(1) of this
section that results in bodily injury to another person.
(2) A driver may not commit a violation of subsection (b)(1) or (c)(1) of this
section that results in death of another person.
(e) (1) In this subsection, “crime of violence” has the meaning stated in §
14–101 of the Criminal Law Article.
(2) A driver may not commit a violation of subsection (b)(1) or (c)(1) of this
section while the driver is attempting to elude a police officer who is signaling for the driver
to stop for the purpose of apprehending the driver for the commission of a crime of violence
for which the driver is subsequently convicted.
(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a person
convicted of a violation of this section is subject to:
(i) For a first offense, imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine
not exceeding $1,000 or both; and
(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, imprisonment not exceeding
2 years or a fine not exceeding $1,000 or both.
(2) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (d)(1) or (e) of this section
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(3) A person [convicted of a violation of] WHO VIOLATES subsection (d)(2)
of this section is GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS subject to:
(I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, imprisonment not exceeding [10] 5
years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both; AND

HOUSE BILL 686 3
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.